Hawaii statutes.
§88-119.5 Investment guidelines.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, real estate loans and mortgages
made pursuant to section 88-119(1)(D) and (E) shall be in accordance with
conditions and restrictions set forth by the board of trustees; provided that
the board may establish the minimum and maximum loan amounts and interest rates
for these real estate loans and mortgages by motion, at any duly noticed
meeting of the board. The board of trustees, subject to chapter 91, shall
adopt, amend, and repeal rules having the force of and effect of law to
implement all provisions of this section other than those relating to loan
amounts and interest rates for its real estate loans and mortgages. [L 1982, c
165, §3; am L 1991, c 17, §2; am L 1998, c 151, §22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next